Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB612.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Menstrual Equity Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Armory." As defined in 51 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions)."College." Any of the following:(1) A community college as defined under section 1901-A of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949.(2) A State-related institution as defined under section 1234567891011121314151617 1502-A of the Public School Code of 1949.(3) A university under the jurisdiction of the State System of Higher Education under Article XX-A of the Public School Code of 1949."Correctional facility." A correctional institution as defined under 61 Pa.C.S. § 5905(e) (relating to healthy birth for incarcerated women). The term includes a privately owned facility which has contracted with the Commonwealth, a county or a municipality to house an inmate for purposes of carrying out a sentence under the laws of this Commonwealth and operates within the geographic boundaries of this Commonwealth."Disposable menstrual product." A product used by an individual for use in connection with the menstrual cycle, including, but not limited to, sanitary napkins, tampons, liners and other similar products."School entity." As defined under section 121 of the Public School Code of 1949.Section 3. Provision of disposable menstrual products.The following entities shall provide disposable menstrual products at no cost and make the disposable menstrual products available in restroom facilities in a convenient manner that does not stigmatize any individuals seeking the disposable menstrual products:(1) A provider of temporary housing assistance located in this Commonwealth, which shall include, but not be limited to, shelters designated to provide temporary living arrangements, including hotels or motels paid for by Federal, State or local government programs for low-income individuals or by charitable organizations, congregate shelters and transitional housing or a provider of temporary housing 20250SB0612PN0911 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 assistance that otherwise receives funding under the Federal Emergency Food and Shelter Grant Program authorized by the McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act (Public Law 100-77, 101 Stat. 482).(2) A school entity.(3) A college.(4) A department or agency of the Commonwealth which operates an office or facility open to the public to provide assistance with unemployment compensation, food and housing assistance, housing financing, temporary guardianship or custodianship, probation and parole or library services.(5) A correctional facility.(6) An armory.Section 4. Rules and regulations.(a) Regulatory authority.--The following secretaries shall promulgate temporary and permanent regulations in accordance with this section:(1) The Secretary of Human Services shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement and enforce section 3(1), (4) and (5).(2) The Secretary of Education shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement and enforce section 3(2) and (3).(3) The Secretary of Labor and Industry, in collaboration with the Secretary of Human Services, shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement and enforce section 3(4).(4) The Secretary of Corrections, in collaboration with the Secretary of Human Services, shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement and enforce section 3(5).20250SB0612PN0911 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) The Adjutant General shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement and enforce section 3(6).(b) Temporary regulations.--The secretaries listed under subsection (a) may promulgate temporary regulations that shall expire no later than two years following the publication of the temporary regulations. Each secretary may promulgate temporary regulations not subject to:(1) Sections 201, 202, 203, 204 and 205 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law.(2) Sections 204(b) and 301(10) of the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(3) The act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.(c) Expiration.--Each secretary's authority to adopt temporary regulations under subsection (b) shall expire two years after the effective date of this subsection. Regulations adopted after this period shall be promulgated as provided by law.(d) Publication.--Each secretary shall begin transmitting the temporary regulations to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin no later than six months after the effective date of this subsection.Section 5. Effective date.This act shall take effect as follows:(1) Section 3 shall take effect July 1, 2025.(2) The remainder of this act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0612PN0911 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930